District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0697.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
33 act may be cited as the "Department of Energy and Environment Reporting Requirements
34 Amendment Act of 2026".
35 Sec. 2. Section 6 of the District of Columbia Applications Insurance Implementation act,
36 effective May 26, 1976 (D.C. Law 1-64; D.C. Official Code§ 6-505), is repealed.
37 Sec. 3. Section 10 of the Green Building Act of 2006, effective March 8, 2007 (D.C. Law
38 16-234; D.C. Official Code§ 6-1451.09), is amended as follows:
39 (a) Subsection (f) is amended as follows:
1

40 (1) Strike the phrase “an annual report of its recommendations.” and insert the
41 phrase “a report of its recommendations once every 2 years.” in its place.
42 (2) Strike the phrase “distributed to all members of the Council and the Mayor
43 and made available to the general public within 30 days after its issuance.” and insert the phrase
44 “transmitted to DOEE and published and maintained on DOEE’s website to be available to the
45 general public.” in its place.
46 (b) Subsection (g) is amended as follows:
47 (1) The lead-in language is amended by striking the word “annual” and inserting
48 the word “biennial” in its place.
49 (2) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “past fiscal year, separated by
50 category;” and inserting the phrase “past 2 fiscal years; and” in its place.
51 (3) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “past fiscal year, referencing
52 that year’s annual green plan’s goals; and” and inserting the phrase “past 2 fiscal years.” in its
53 place.
54 (4) Paragraph (3) is repealed.
55 Sec. 4. The District Department of the Environment Establishment Act of 2005, effective
56 February 15, 2006 (D.C. Law 16-51; D.C. Official Code § 8-151.01 et seq.), is amended as
57 follows:
58 (a) Section 108 (D.C. Official Code § 8-151.08) is amended as follows:
59 (1) Paragraph (1) is repealed.
60 (2) Paragraph (6) is amended by striking the semicolon and inserting the phrase “;
61 and” in its place.
62 (3) Paragraph (7) is repealed.
2

63 (b) Section 109d (D.C. Official Code § 8-151.09d) is amended as follows:
64 (1) Subsection (b)(2)(A) is amended to read as follows:
65 “(A) To achieve the reduction required by paragraph (1) of this subsection,
66 the Mayor shall establish a task force to prepare, by December 20, 2025, an action plan for
67 carbon neutrality for District government operations by 2040, including the estimated funding
68 and timeline for each action identified, which shall be submitted to the Council no later than
69 September 30, 2026.”
70 (2) The lead-in language of subsection (d) is amended by striking the phrase
71 “Beginning on July 1, 2025, and on July 1 of each year thereafter, DOEE shall submit an annual
72 report to the Council which summarizes progress on” and inserting the phrase “Beginning on
73 September 30, 2027, and by September 30 of each year thereafter, DOEE shall submit an annual
74 report to the Council that summarizes progress during the previous year on” in its place.
75 (c) The lead-in language of section 113a(e) (D.C. Official Code § 8-151.13a(e)) is
76 amended by striking the phrase “Within 60 days after the end of each fiscal year, DOEE shall
77 transmit to the Mayor and the Council and publicly post on the DOEE” and inserting the phrase
78 “By June 1 of each year, DOEE shall publish and maintain on its” in its place.
79 (d) Section 151 (D.C. Official Code § 8-152.01) is amended as follows:
80 (1) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the phrase “In coordination with the
81 submission of the report required by subsection (f) of this section, the” and inserting the word
82 “The” in its place.
83 (2) Subsection (f) is repealed.
84 Sec. 5. Section 5 of the District of Columbia Office of Energy Act of 1980, effective
85 March 4, 1981 (D.C. Law 3-132; D.C. Official Code § 8-171.04), is amended as follows:
3

86 (a) Subsection (e)(8) is amended by striking the phrase “3 years” both times it appears
87 and inserting the phrase “5 years” in its place.
88 (b) Subsection (i) is repealed.
89 Sec. 6. Section 4(c) of the Commission on Climate Change and Resiliency Establishment
90 Act of 2016, effective February 18, 2017 (D.C. Law 21-185; D.C. Official Code § 8-181.03(c)),
91 is repealed.
92 Sec. 7. Title I of the Sustainable Solid Waste Management Amendment Act of 2014,
93 effective February 26, 2015 (D.C. Law 20-154; D.C. Official Code § 8-1031.01 et seq.), is
94 amended as follows:
95 (a) Section 112d(d) (D.C. Official Code § 8-1031.12d(d)) is amended by striking the
96 phrase “provide a report to the Mayor and the Council” and inserting the phrase “publish and
97 maintain on its website a report” in its place.
98 (b) Section 124 (D.C. Official Code § 8-1041.10) is amended as follows:
99 (1) Subsection (a) is amended by:
100 (A) Striking the phrase “submit a report to the Council” and inserting the
101 phrase “publish and maintain on the website required by section 120(b) a report” in its place; and
102 (B) Striking the phrase “section 116. The annual reports shall be posted
103 on the Mayor’s website by June 1 of each year.” and inserting the phrase “section 116.” in its
104 place.
105 (2) Subsection (b) is repealed.
106 (c) Section 133(c) (D.C. Official Code § 8-771.06(c)) is amended by striking the phrase
107 “provide this report to the Council and” and inserting the phrase “publish and maintain this
108 report” in its place.
4

109 Sec. 8. Section 18 of the District of Columbia Hazardous Waste Management Act of
110 1977, effective March 8, 1991 (D.C. Law 8-229; D.C. Official Code § 8-1316), is repealed.
111 Sec. 9. Section 10 of the District of Columbia Soil and Water Conservation Act of 1982,
112 effective September 14, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-143; D.C. Official Code § 8-1709), is amended as
113 follows:
114 (a) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
115 “Sec. 10. Cooperative agreements; documentary function; public hearings.”.
116 (b) Subsection (e) is repealed.
117 Sec. 10. Section 403 of Title IV of the CleanEnergy DC Omnibus Amendment Act of
118 2018, effective March 22, 2019 (D.C. Law 22-257; D.C. Official Code § 8-1772.33), is amended
119 by striking the phrase “The Department of Energy and Environment shall submit an annual
120 report to the Mayor and the Council on” and inserting the phrase “By March 1 of every even-
121 numbered year, the Department of Energy and Environment shall publish and maintain on its
122 website a report on” in its place.
123 Sec. 11. Title II of the Clean and Affordable Energy Amendment Act of 2008, effective
124 October 22, 2008 (D.C. Law 17-250; D.C. Official Code § 8-1773.01 et seq.), is amended as
125 follows:
126 (a) Section 205 (D.C. Official Code § 8-1774.05) is amended as follows:
127 (1) Subsection (j) is repealed.
128 (2) Subsection (k) is amended to read as follows:
129 “(k) The DOEE may commission, on an annual basis, an independent review of
130 expenditures of the SEU and, at the end of each contract cycle, an independent review of the
5

131 performance of the SEU. The DOEE shall provide the results of each review to the Board and the
132 Council within 6 months after the completion of the review.”.
133 (b) The lead-in language of section 210(e) (D.C. Official Code § 8-1774.10(e)) is
134 amended by striking the phrase “shall submit to the Council a quarterly” and inserting the phrase
135 “shall, by June 30 of each year, publish and maintain on its website an annual” in its place.
136 (c) The lead-in language of section 211(e) (D.C. Official Code § 8-1774.11(e)) is
137 amended by striking the phrase “shall submit to the Council a quarterly” and inserting the phrase
138 “shall, by June 30 of each year, publish and maintain on its website an annual” in its place.
139 (d) Section 216(f) (D.C. Official Code § 8-1774.16(f)) is amended to read as follows:
140 “(f) By June 30 of each year, DOEE shall publish and maintain on its website an annual
141 report on:
142 “(1) The expenditure of the funds allocated to the Program, the amount of
143 progress toward achieving the benchmarks established in subsection (e)(1)(C) of this section, and
144 the number of solar systems installed pursuant to this section in the previous fiscal year;
145 “(2) The number of qualified certified business enterprises that received loans,
146 grants, rebates, and other financial incentives from the Renewable Energy Development Fund
147 (“REDF”) established by section 8 of the Renewable Energy Portfolio Standard Act of 2004,
148 effective April 12, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-340; D.C. Official Code § 34-1436), and the eligible
149 project or projects for which the certified business enterprise received funding; and
150 “(3) All other expenditures from the REDF and the performance of all other
151 programs or projects funded by the REDF.”.
152 (e) Section 217(c) (D.C. Official Code § 8-1774.17(c)) is amended by striking the phrase
153 “calendar year” both times it appears and inserting the phrase “fiscal year” in its place.
6

154 Sec. 12. The Smart Lighting Study Act of 2009, effective March 3, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-
155 111; D.C. Official Code § 8-1776.01 et seq.), is repealed.
156 Sec. 13. Section 8(e) of the Wildlife Protection Act of 2010, effective March 8, 2011
157 (D.C. Law 18-289; D.C. Official Code § 8-2207(e)), is repealed.
158 Sec. 14. Section 8 of the Renewable Energy Portfolio Standard Act of 2004, effective
159 April 12, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-340; D.C. Official Code § 34-1436), is amended as follows:
160 (a) Subsection (b)(2) is repealed.
161 (b) Subsection (f) is repealed.
162 Sec. 15. The Lead Service Line Priority Replacement Assistance Act of 2004, effective
163 December 7, 2004 (D.C. Law 15-205; D.C. Official Code § 34-2151 et seq.), is amended as
164 follows:
165 (a) Section 6019e (D.C. Official Code § 34-2162) is repealed.
166 (b) Section 6019f (D.C. Official Code § 34-2163) is amended as follows:
167 (1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
168 (A) Strike the phrase “and the Department of Energy and Environment
169 (“DOEE”) shall separately” and insert the word “shall” in its place.
170 (B) Strike the phrase “DC Water’s report” and insert the phrase “The
171 report” in its place.
172 (2) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “DC Water and DOEE shall
173 transmit the reports” and inserting the phrase “DC Water shall transmit the report” in its place.
174 Sec. 16. Section 5-301(f) of the Retail Service Station Act of 1976, effective April 19,
175 1977 (D.C. Law 1-123; D.C. Official Code § 36-304.01(f)), is repealed.
7

176 Sec. 17. The Fees for Clinical Services and Asbestos Abatement Act of 1984, effective
177 March 15, 1985 (D.C. Law 5-173; D.C. Official Code § 44-731 et seq.), is amended as follows:
178 (a) Section 2(b)(1)(C) (D.C. Official Code § 44-731(b)(1)(C)) is amended by striking the
179 phrase “in accordance with recommendations of the Task Force on Asbestos Abatement and”
180 and inserting the phrase “in accordance with” in its place.
181 (b) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 44-732) is repealed.
182 (c) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 44-733) is amended by striking the phrase
183 “regulations, in accordance with recommendations of the Task Force, to” and inserting the
184 phrase “regulations to” in its place.
185 Sec. 18. Fiscal impact statement.
186 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
187 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
188 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
189 Sec. 19. Effective date.
190 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
191 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
192 provided in section 602(c)(l) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
193 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(l)), and publication in the District of
194 Columbia Register.
8

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: March 16, 2026
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – Department of Energy and Environment
Reporting Requirements Amendment Act of 2026
REFERENCE: Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on February 9,
2026
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 through fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to
implement the bill.
Background
The Department of Energy and Environment (DOEE) manages several programs and oversees
several funding sources that require the agency to publish or transmit various oversight reports
related to those activities and funds. The bill delays or eliminates many reporting requirements
where DOEE has been challenged meeting enumerated deadlines or where the reporting
requirement is outdated.
The bill changes the Green Building Advisory Council’s (GBAC) report of recommendations from an
annual report to a biennial report and only requires GBAC to transmit the report to DOEE for posting
to its website rather than transmitting it to the Mayor and Council. The bill repeals the Mayor’s
requirement to issue an annually updated Green Building Plan.1
The bill delays the carbon neutrality task force’s initial action plan from eighteen months after
September 21, 2022 to December 20, 2025. The bill imposes a deadline of April 20, 2026 for DOEE to
1 Green Building Act of 2006, effective March 8, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-234; D.C. Official Code § 6-1451.09).
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Department of Energy and Environment Reporting Requirements Act of 2026,” Draft bill as provided to
the Office of Revenue Analysis on February 9, 2026
submit the timeline and estimated funding requirements to implement the task force’s actions to
Council. The bill also delays DOEE’s annual greenhouse gas reduction progress report from July 1,
2025 and each July 1st thereafter to beginning one year after DOEE submits its carbon neutrality plan
and annually thereafter. The bill specifies that DOEE should include an updated projection of the
District’s 2040 greenhouse gas emissions in the annual reports.2
The bill repeals an interim report on the Commission on Climate Change and Resiliency’s activities
and recommendations that was due in 2018.3
The bill establishes a deadline of June 1st of each year for DOEE to report on the prior fiscal year’s
financial assistance programs for nonprofit organizations and residents who need support paying
the impervious area charges on their water bills.4
The bill eliminates a requirement for DOEE to submit to the Mayor and the Council and to make public
the annual report the agency submits to the federal Environmental Protection Agency regarding
DOEE’s stormwater permit activities.5
The bill repeals a requirement that DOEE annually report on progress made under the National Flood
Control Program.6
The bill repeals an annual report from the Soil and Water Conservation District regarding its
activities, plans, budgets, expenditures, and programs.7
The bill changes from three years to five years the frequency with which DOEE should review and
revise, if necessary, the District’s energy conservation plan. The bill repeals an Office of Energy annual
report.8
The bill requires DOEE to post its reports related to the donation and reuse program, electronic waste
product stewardship program, and battery stewardship program on its website rather than transmit
them to Council. While the bill maintains these annual reports, it eliminates a 2019 report evaluating
the effectiveness of the electric waste program.9
2 Climate Commitment Amendment Act of 2022, effective September 21, 2022 (D.C. Law 24-176; D.C. Official
Code § 8-151.09d).
3 Commission on Climate Change and Resiliency Establishment Act of 2016, effective February 18, 2017 (D.C.
Law 21-185; D.C. Official Code § 8-181.03(c)). This report was published in 2019: RC23-0116 -
Correspondence from the Mayor - The Commission on Climate Change and Resiliency
4 District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority Omnibus Amendment Act of 2020, effective March 16, 2021
(D.C. Law 23-229; D.C. Official Code § 8-151.13a).
5 8-152.01
6 District of Columbia Applications Insurance Implementation Act, effective May 26, 1976 (D.C. Law 1-64; D.C.
Official Code § 6-505).
7 District of Columbia Soil and Water Conservation Act of 1982, effective September 14, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-142;
D.C. Official Code § 8-1709(e)).
8 District of Columbia Office of Energy Act of 1980, effective March 4, 1981 (D.C. Law 3-132; D.C. Official Code
§ 8-171.04).
9 This report was issued in 2019: RC23-0075 - Correspondence from the Mayor - DOEE Three-Year
Assessment eCYCLE DC: Electronics Product Stewardship Program, Urban Sustainability Administration June
2019
Page 2 of 4

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Department of Energy and Environment Reporting Requirements Act of 2026,” Draft bill as provided to
the Office of Revenue Analysis on February 9, 2026
The bill changes from annual to biennial a DOEE reporting requirement related to the agency’s
coordination with the Department of Small and Local Business Development on a training and
certification program for certified business enterprises.10 The bill also establishes that this report
only needs to be posted on DOEE’s website.
The bill clarifies that the independent review of the District’s Sustainable Energy Utility (SEU) should
be annually for a review of expenditures and at the end of each contract cycle for a review of SEU
performance. The bill requires DOEE to publish an annual report on its website, by June 30th, detailing
the expenditures from and performance of programs funded by the Sustainable Energy Trust Fund
(SETF),11 which funds the SEU as its primary expenditure. The bill establishes the same reporting
requirement for the Energy Assistance Trust Fund12 as the SETF.
DOEE manages the Solar for All program13 to increase access to solar energy among District residents,
nonprofits, and small businesses. The Solar for All program is funded from the Renewable Energy
Development Fund (REDF).14 The bill shifts DOEE’s annual Solar for All program performance
reporting deadline from December 1st annually to June 30th annually. The bill also shifts REDF
expenditure and performance reporting into the annual Solar for All report.
The bill repeals a 2010 smart lighting study that required DOEE to assess optimal lighting standards
and strategies for the District.15
DC Water runs a lead water pipe replacement assistance program for District residents.16 The bill
terminates the Lead Service Line Planning Task Force17 that was charged with developing an
interagency plan to remove and replace all lead pipes in the District. The Task Force was scheduled
to dissolve after it delivered its report. The bill also eliminates one of DOEE’s required reports related
to the program and affirms that DC Water is responsible for this report.
The bill repeals a 2013 report where DOEE was required to assess wildlife control services and
practices in the District.18
10 CleanEnergy DC Omnibus Amendment Act of 2018, effective March 22, 2019 (D.C. Law 22-257; D.C. Official
Code § 8-1772.32).
11 Clean and Affordable Energy Act of 2008, effective October 22, 2008, (D.C. Law 17-250; D.C. Official Code §
8-1774.10).
12 D.C. Official Code § 8-1774.11.
13 Renewable Portfolio Standard Expansion Amendment Act of 2016, effective October 8, 2016 (D.C. Law 21-
154; D.C. Official Code § 8-1774.16).
14 Renewable Energy Portfolio Standard Act of 2004, effective April 12, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-340; D.C. Official
Code § 34-1436).
15 Smart Lighting Study Act of 2009, effective March 3, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-111; D.C. Official Code 8-1776.01 et
seq.).
16 Lead Service Line Priority Replacement Assistance Act of 2004, effective December 7, 2004 (D.C. Law 15-
205; D.C. Official Code § 34-2151 et seq.).
17 Lead Service Line Planning Task Force Establishment Act of 2021, effective November 13, 2021 (D.C. Law
24-45; D.C. Official Code § 34-2162).
18 Wildlife Protection Act of 2010, effective March 8, 2011 (D.C. Law 18-289; D.C. Official Code § 8-2207(e)).
Page 3 of 4

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Department of Energy and Environment Reporting Requirements Act of 2026,” Draft bill as provided to
the Office of Revenue Analysis on February 9, 2026
The bill repeals a 2001 study that required the Mayor to assess the adequacy and convenience of full
service and non-full service retail service stations in the District.19 A full service station contains a
garage, service bay, work area, or other space to repair, maintain, or service motor vehicles.
The bill repeals the Task Force on Asbestos Abatement (Task Force). The Task Force was charged
with assessing the presence of asbestos in publicly-owned or leased buildings.
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 through fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to
implement the bill. Some of these reports have never been produced and are outdated, some have
been produced on delayed timelines, and others have been regularly produced. There are no costs
associated with DOEE shifting reporting deadlines, combining reports, posting them on the agency
website in lieu of transmitting to Council where relevant, or repealing outdated requirements.
19 Retail Service Station Amendment Act of 2000, effective June 24, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-130; D.C. Official Code §
36-304.01).
Page 4 of 4

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL
ATTORNEY GENERAL ATTORNEY-CLIENT COMMUNICATION
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: January 28, 2026
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of Draft Legislation, the “Department of Energy and
Environment Reporting Requirements Amendment Act of 2026”
(AE-25-391-B)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
above-referenced legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this
regard, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W., Suite 409, Washington, D.C. 20004
Phone (202) 262-6402 Email: adele.el-khouri@dc.gov